Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Designated representative” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.796.
(b) “Exclusive representative”  and “labor organization” have the meanings given those
terms in ORS 243.650.
(c) “Falsely impersonate a union representative” means to use fraud  or misrepresen-
tation to make  a verbal or written communication that purports to be authorized or other-
wise approved by a labor organization but that has not, in fact,  been authorized or approved
by the labor organization, with the intent to  undermine or interfere with the operations of
the labor organization, or otherwise negatively impact the labor organization.
(d) “Fraud or misrepresentation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.188.
(e) “Union representative” means:
(A) An exclusive representative.
(B) A designated representative.
(C) An employee or staff member of a labor organization.
(D) A member of a labor organization who serves in  an elected or appointed position
within the union.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to falsely impersonate a union representative.
(3) To protect public employees who are members of a labor organization from fraud  or
misrepresentation, including the false impersonation  of a union representative, a labor or-
ganization shall have, as a matter of  internal governance, the sole authority to identify and
designate the union representatives associated with the labor organization.
(4)(a) A union representative alleging a  violation of this section may bring a civil action
in a court of appropriate jurisdiction to obtain damages.
(b) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other damages that may be claimed, a plaintiff
shall receive statutory damages in an  amount of $6,250 per incident in any action in which
the plaintiff establishes that the defendant falsely impersonated a union representative.
Enrolled House Bill 3789 (HB 3789-B) Page 1
Passed by House April 10, 2025
Repassed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 28, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3789 (HB 3789-B) Page 2